apertium-deu.deu.dix
<pardef n="anbr/ingen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>achten</l>    <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>achten</l>    <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ächten</l>    <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ächten</l>    <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>achte</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>achte</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ächte</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ächte</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>achtest</l>   <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ächtest</l>   <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>achtet</l>    <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ächtet</l>    <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingend</l>    <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inge</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inge</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inge</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingest</l>    <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inget</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingst</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingt</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingt</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/fahren#_an__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>fahren</l>    <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fahren</l>    <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fahren</l>    <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fahren</l>    <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fahre</l>     <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fahre</l>     <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fahre</l>     <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fahrest</l>   <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fahret</l>    <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fahr</l>      <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fährst</l>    <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fahrt</l>     <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fahrt</l>     <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fährt</l>     <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fuhren</l>    <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fuhren</l>    <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>führen</l>    <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>führen</l>    <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>führe</l>     <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>führe</l>     <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>führest</l>   <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>führet</l>    <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fuhr</l>      <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fuhr</l>      <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fuhrst</l>    <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fuhrt</l>     <r>fahren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="anbringen">       <i>anbr</i><par n="anbr/ingen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="anfahren">        <i></i><par n="/fahren#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="beibringen">      <i>beibr</i><par n="anbr/ingen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="einbringen">      <i>einbr</i><par n="anbr/ingen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="herausbringen">   <i>herausbr</i><par n="anbr/ingen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="mitbringen">      <i>mitbr</i><par n="anbr/ingen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="umbringen">       <i>umbr</i><par n="anbr/ingen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="unterbringen">    <i>unterbr</i><par n="anbr/ingen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="zurückbringen">   <i>zurückbr</i><par n="anbr/ingen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="zusammenbringen"> <i>zusammenbr</i><par n="anbr/ingen__vblex_sep"/></e>
